Illinois, session 104th, SB1299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Sections 10, 15, 75, 80, 90, and 95 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 9/10)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-844)9    Sec. 10. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:10    "Activities of daily living" means eating, dressing, 11bathing, toileting, transferring, or personal hygiene.12    "Assisted living establishment" or "establishment" means a 13home, building, residence, or any other place where sleeping 14accommodations are provided for at least 3 unrelated adults, 15at least 80% of whom are 55 years of age or older and where the 16following are provided consistent with the purposes of this 17Act:18        (1) services consistent with a social model that is 19    based on the premise that the resident's unit in assisted 20    living and shared housing is his or her own home;21        (2) community-based residential care for persons who 22    need assistance with activities of daily living, including 23    personal, supportive, and intermittent health-related   SB1299- 2 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    services available 24 hours per day, if needed, to meet 2    the scheduled and unscheduled needs of a resident;3        (3) mandatory services, whether provided directly by 4    the establishment or by another entity arranged for by the 5    establishment, with the consent of the resident or 6    resident's representative; and7        (4) a physical environment that is a homelike setting 8    that includes the following and such other elements as 9    established by the Department: individual living units 10    each of which shall accommodate small kitchen appliances 11    and contain private bathing, washing, and toilet 12    facilities, or private washing and toilet facilities with 13    a common bathing room readily accessible to each resident. 14    Units shall be maintained for single occupancy except in 15    cases in which 2 residents choose to share a unit. 16    Sufficient common space shall exist to permit individual 17    and group activities.18    "Assisted living establishment" or "establishment" does 19not mean any of the following:20        (1) A home, institution, or similar place operated by 21    the federal government or the State of Illinois.22        (2) A long term care facility licensed under the 23    Nursing Home Care Act, a facility licensed under the 24    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 25    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, or a 26    facility licensed under the MC/DD Act. However, a facility   SB1299- 3 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    licensed under any of those Acts may convert distinct 2    parts of the facility to assisted living. If the facility 3    elects to do so, the facility shall retain the Certificate 4    of Need for its nursing and sheltered care beds that were 5    converted.6        (3) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 7    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis, 8    care, and treatment of human illness and that is required 9    to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.10        (4) A facility for child care as defined in the Child 11    Care Act of 1969.12        (5) A community living facility as defined in the 13    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act.14        (6) A nursing home or sanitarium operated solely by 15    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 16    spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the 17    creed or tenants of a well-recognized church or religious 18    denomination.19        (7) A facility licensed by the Department of Human 20    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 21    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 22    Licensure and Certification Act.23        (8) A supportive residence licensed under the 24    Supportive Residences Licensing Act.25        (9) The portion of a life care facility as defined in 26    the Life Care Facilities Act not licensed as an assisted   SB1299- 4 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    living establishment under this Act; a life care facility 2    may apply under this Act to convert sections of the 3    community to assisted living.4        (10) A free-standing hospice facility licensed under 5    the Hospice Program Licensing Act.6        (11) A shared housing establishment.7        (12) A supportive living facility as described in 8    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code.9    "Certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 10qualifications for certification under Section 79 and assists 11with medication administration while under the supervision of 12a registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 13of the Nurse Practice Act in an assisted living establishment. 14    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.15    "Director" means the Director of Public Health.16    "Emergency situation" means imminent danger of death or 17serious physical harm to a resident of an establishment.18    "License" means any of the following types of licenses 19issued to an applicant or licensee by the Department:20        (1) "Probationary license" means a license issued to 21    an applicant or licensee that has not held a license under 22    this Act prior to its application or pursuant to a license 23    transfer in accordance with Section 50 of this Act.24        (2) "Regular license" means a license issued by the 25    Department to an applicant or licensee that is in 26    substantial compliance with this Act and any rules   SB1299- 5 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    promulgated under this Act.2    "Licensee" means a person, agency, association, 3corporation, partnership, or organization that has been issued 4a license to operate an assisted living or shared housing 5establishment. 6    "Licensed health care professional" means a registered 7professional nurse, an advanced practice registered nurse, a 8physician assistant, and a licensed practical nurse.9    "Mandatory services" include the following:10        (1) 3 meals per day available to the residents 11    prepared by the establishment or an outside contractor;12        (2) housekeeping services including, but not limited 13    to, vacuuming, dusting, and cleaning the resident's unit;14        (3) personal laundry and linen services available to 15    the residents provided or arranged for by the 16    establishment;17        (4) security provided 24 hours each day including, but 18    not limited to, locked entrances or building or contract 19    security personnel;20        (5) an emergency communication response system, which 21    is a procedure in place 24 hours each day by which a 22    resident can notify building management, an emergency 23    response vendor, or others able to respond to his or her 24    need for assistance; and25        (6) assistance with activities of daily living as 26    required by each resident.  SB1299- 6 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    "Negotiated risk" is the process by which a resident, or 2his or her representative, may formally negotiate with 3providers what risks each are willing and unwilling to assume 4in service provision and the resident's living environment. 5The provider assures that the resident and the resident's 6representative, if any, are informed of the risks of these 7decisions and of the potential consequences of assuming these 8risks.9    "Owner" means the individual, partnership, corporation, 10association, or other person who owns an assisted living or 11shared housing establishment. In the event an assisted living 12or shared housing establishment is operated by a person who 13leases or manages the physical plant, which is owned by 14another person, "owner" means the person who operates the 15assisted living or shared housing establishment, except that 16if the person who owns the physical plant is an affiliate of 17the person who operates the assisted living or shared housing 18establishment and has significant control over the day to day 19operations of the assisted living or shared housing 20establishment, the person who owns the physical plant shall 21incur jointly and severally with the owner all liabilities 22imposed on an owner under this Act.23    "Physician" means a person licensed under the Medical 24Practice Act of 1987 to practice medicine in all of its 25branches.26    "Program" means the Certified Medication Aide Program.   SB1299- 7 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    "Qualified establishment" means an assisted living and 2shared housing establishment licensed by the Department of 3Public Health. 4    "Resident" means a person residing in an assisted living 5or shared housing establishment.6    "Resident's representative" means a person, other than the 7owner, agent, or employee of an establishment or of the health 8care provider unless related to the resident, designated in 9writing by a resident or a court to be his or her 10representative. This designation may be accomplished through 11the Illinois Power of Attorney Act, pursuant to the 12guardianship process under the Probate Act of 1975, or 13pursuant to an executed designation of representative form 14specified by the Department.15    "Self" means the individual or the individual's designated 16representative.17    "Shared housing establishment" or "establishment" means a 18publicly or privately operated free-standing residence for 16 19or fewer persons, at least 80% of whom are 55 years of age or 20older and who are unrelated to the owners and one manager of 21the residence, where the following are provided:22        (1) services consistent with a social model that is 23    based on the premise that the resident's unit is his or her 24    own home;25        (2) community-based residential care for persons who 26    need assistance with activities of daily living, including   SB1299- 8 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    housing and personal, supportive, and intermittent 2    health-related services available 24 hours per day, if 3    needed, to meet the scheduled and unscheduled needs of a 4    resident; and5        (3) mandatory services, whether provided directly by 6    the establishment or by another entity arranged for by the 7    establishment, with the consent of the resident or the 8    resident's representative.9    "Shared housing establishment" or "establishment" does not 10mean any of the following:11        (1) A home, institution, or similar place operated by 12    the federal government or the State of Illinois.13        (2) A long term care facility licensed under the 14    Nursing Home Care Act, a facility licensed under the 15    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 16    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, or a 17    facility licensed under the MC/DD Act. A facility licensed 18    under any of those Acts may, however, convert sections of 19    the facility to assisted living. If the facility elects to 20    do so, the facility shall retain the Certificate of Need 21    for its nursing beds that were converted.22        (3) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 23    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis, 24    care, and treatment of human illness and that is required 25    to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.26        (4) A facility for child care as defined in the Child   SB1299- 9 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    Care Act of 1969.2        (5) A community living facility as defined in the 3    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act.4        (6) A nursing home or sanitarium operated solely by 5    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 6    spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the 7    creed or tenants of a well-recognized church or religious 8    denomination.9        (7) A facility licensed by the Department of Human 10    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 11    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 12    Licensure and Certification Act.13        (8) A supportive residence licensed under the 14    Supportive Residences Licensing Act.15        (9) A life care facility as defined in the Life Care 16    Facilities Act; a life care facility may apply under this 17    Act to convert sections of the community to assisted 18    living.19        (10) A free-standing hospice facility licensed under 20    the Hospice Program Licensing Act.21        (11) An assisted living establishment.22        (12) A supportive living facility as described in 23    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code.24    "Total assistance" means that staff or another individual 25performs the entire activity of daily living without 26participation by the resident.  SB1299- 10 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1(Source: P.A. 103-886, eff. 8-9-24.) 2    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-844)3    Sec. 10. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:4    "Activities of daily living" means eating, dressing, 5bathing, toileting, transferring, or personal hygiene.6    "Assisted living establishment" or "establishment" means a 7home, building, residence, or any other place where sleeping 8accommodations are provided for at least 3 unrelated adults, 9at least 80% of whom are 55 years of age or older and where the 10following are provided consistent with the purposes of this 11Act:12        (1) services consistent with a social model that is 13    based on the premise that the resident's unit in assisted 14    living and shared housing is his or her own home;15        (2) community-based residential care for persons who 16    need assistance with activities of daily living, including 17    personal, supportive, and intermittent health-related 18    services available 24 hours per day, if needed, to meet 19    the scheduled and unscheduled needs of a resident;20        (3) mandatory services, whether provided directly by 21    the establishment or by another entity arranged for by the 22    establishment, with the consent of the resident or 23    resident's representative; and24        (4) a physical environment that is a homelike setting 25    that includes the following and such other elements as   SB1299- 11 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    established by the Department: individual living units 2    each of which shall accommodate small kitchen appliances 3    and contain private bathing, washing, and toilet 4    facilities, or private washing and toilet facilities with 5    a common bathing room readily accessible to each resident. 6    Units shall be maintained for single occupancy except in 7    cases in which 2 residents choose to share a unit. 8    Sufficient common space shall exist to permit individual 9    and group activities.10    "Assisted living establishment" or "establishment" does 11not mean any of the following:12        (1) A home, institution, or similar place operated by 13    the federal government or the State of Illinois.14        (2) A long term care facility licensed under the 15    Nursing Home Care Act, a facility licensed under the 16    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 17    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, or a 18    facility licensed under the MC/DD Act. However, a facility 19    licensed under any of those Acts may convert distinct 20    parts of the facility to assisted living. If the facility 21    elects to do so, the facility shall retain the Certificate 22    of Need for its nursing and sheltered care beds that were 23    converted.24        (3) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 25    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis, 26    care, and treatment of human illness and that is required   SB1299- 12 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.2        (4) A facility for child care as defined in the Child 3    Care Act of 1969.4        (5) A community living facility as defined in the 5    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act.6        (6) A nursing home or sanitarium operated solely by 7    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 8    spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the 9    creed or tenants of a well-recognized church or religious 10    denomination.11        (7) A facility licensed by the Department of Human 12    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 13    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 14    Licensure and Certification Act.15        (8) A supportive residence licensed under the 16    Supportive Residences Licensing Act.17        (9) The portion of a life care facility as defined in 18    the Life Care Facilities Act not licensed as an assisted 19    living establishment under this Act; a life care facility 20    may apply under this Act to convert sections of the 21    community to assisted living.22        (10) A free-standing hospice facility licensed under 23    the Hospice Program Licensing Act.24        (11) A shared housing establishment.25        (12) A supportive living facility as described in 26    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code.  SB1299- 13 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    "Certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 2qualifications for certification under Section 79 and assists 3with medication administration while under the supervision of 4a registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 5of the Nurse Practice Act in an assisted living establishment. 6    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.7    "Director" means the Director of Public Health.8    "Emergency situation" means imminent danger of death or 9serious physical harm to a resident of an establishment.10    "Infection control committee" means persons, including an 11infection preventionist, who develop and implement policies 12governing control of infections and communicable diseases and 13are qualified through education, training, experience, or 14certification or a combination of such qualifications. 15    "Infection preventionist" means a registered nurse who 16develops and implements policies governing control of 17infections and communicable diseases and is qualified through 18education, training, experience, or certification or a 19combination of such qualifications. 20    "License" means any of the following types of licenses 21issued to an applicant or licensee by the Department:22        (1) "Probationary license" means a license issued to 23    an applicant or licensee that has not held a license under 24    this Act prior to its application or pursuant to a license 25    transfer in accordance with Section 50 of this Act.26        (2) "Regular license" means a license issued by the   SB1299- 14 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    Department to an applicant or licensee that is in 2    substantial compliance with this Act and any rules 3    promulgated under this Act.4    "Licensee" means a person, agency, association, 5corporation, partnership, or organization that has been issued 6a license to operate an assisted living or shared housing 7establishment. 8    "Licensed health care professional" means a registered 9professional nurse, an advanced practice registered nurse, a 10physician assistant, and a licensed practical nurse.11    "Mandatory services" include the following:12        (1) 3 meals per day available to the residents 13    prepared by the establishment or an outside contractor;14        (2) housekeeping services including, but not limited 15    to, vacuuming, dusting, and cleaning the resident's unit;16        (3) personal laundry and linen services available to 17    the residents provided or arranged for by the 18    establishment;19        (4) security provided 24 hours each day including, but 20    not limited to, locked entrances or building or contract 21    security personnel;22        (5) an emergency communication response system, which 23    is a procedure in place 24 hours each day by which a 24    resident can notify building management, an emergency 25    response vendor, or others able to respond to his or her 26    need for assistance; and  SB1299- 15 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1        (6) assistance with activities of daily living as 2    required by each resident.3    "Negotiated risk" is the process by which a resident, or 4his or her representative, may formally negotiate with 5providers what risks each are willing and unwilling to assume 6in service provision and the resident's living environment. 7The provider assures that the resident and the resident's 8representative, if any, are informed of the risks of these 9decisions and of the potential consequences of assuming these 10risks.11    "Owner" means the individual, partnership, corporation, 12association, or other person who owns an assisted living or 13shared housing establishment. In the event an assisted living 14or shared housing establishment is operated by a person who 15leases or manages the physical plant, which is owned by 16another person, "owner" means the person who operates the 17assisted living or shared housing establishment, except that 18if the person who owns the physical plant is an affiliate of 19the person who operates the assisted living or shared housing 20establishment and has significant control over the day to day 21operations of the assisted living or shared housing 22establishment, the person who owns the physical plant shall 23incur jointly and severally with the owner all liabilities 24imposed on an owner under this Act.25    "Physician" means a person licensed under the Medical 26Practice Act of 1987 to practice medicine in all of its   SB1299- 16 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1branches.2    "Program" means the Certified Medication Aide Program. 3    "Qualified establishment" means an assisted living and 4shared housing establishment licensed by the Department of 5Public Health. 6    "Resident" means a person residing in an assisted living 7or shared housing establishment.8    "Resident's representative" means a person, other than the 9owner, agent, or employee of an establishment or of the health 10care provider unless related to the resident, designated in 11writing by a resident or a court to be his or her 12representative. This designation may be accomplished through 13the Illinois Power of Attorney Act, pursuant to the 14guardianship process under the Probate Act of 1975, or 15pursuant to an executed designation of representative form 16specified by the Department.17    "Self" means the individual or the individual's designated 18representative.19    "Shared housing establishment" or "establishment" means a 20publicly or privately operated free-standing residence for 16 21or fewer persons, at least 80% of whom are 55 years of age or 22older and who are unrelated to the owners and one manager of 23the residence, where the following are provided:24        (1) services consistent with a social model that is 25    based on the premise that the resident's unit is his or her 26    own home;  SB1299- 17 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1        (2) community-based residential care for persons who 2    need assistance with activities of daily living, including 3    housing and personal, supportive, and intermittent 4    health-related services available 24 hours per day, if 5    needed, to meet the scheduled and unscheduled needs of a 6    resident; and7        (3) mandatory services, whether provided directly by 8    the establishment or by another entity arranged for by the 9    establishment, with the consent of the resident or the 10    resident's representative.11    "Shared housing establishment" or "establishment" does not 12mean any of the following:13        (1) A home, institution, or similar place operated by 14    the federal government or the State of Illinois.15        (2) A long term care facility licensed under the 16    Nursing Home Care Act, a facility licensed under the 17    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 18    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, or a 19    facility licensed under the MC/DD Act. A facility licensed 20    under any of those Acts may, however, convert sections of 21    the facility to assisted living. If the facility elects to 22    do so, the facility shall retain the Certificate of Need 23    for its nursing beds that were converted.24        (3) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 25    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis, 26    care, and treatment of human illness and that is required   SB1299- 18 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.2        (4) A facility for child care as defined in the Child 3    Care Act of 1969.4        (5) A community living facility as defined in the 5    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act.6        (6) A nursing home or sanitarium operated solely by 7    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 8    spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the 9    creed or tenants of a well-recognized church or religious 10    denomination.11        (7) A facility licensed by the Department of Human 12    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 13    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 14    Licensure and Certification Act.15        (8) A supportive residence licensed under the 16    Supportive Residences Licensing Act.17        (9) A life care facility as defined in the Life Care 18    Facilities Act; a life care facility may apply under this 19    Act to convert sections of the community to assisted 20    living.21        (10) A free-standing hospice facility licensed under 22    the Hospice Program Licensing Act.23        (11) An assisted living establishment.24        (12) A supportive living facility as described in 25    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code.26    "Total assistance" means that staff or another individual   SB1299- 19 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1performs the entire activity of daily living without 2participation by the resident.3(Source: P.A. 103-844, eff. 7-1-25; 103-886, eff. 8-9-24; 4revised 10-7-24.) 5    (210 ILCS 9/15)6    Sec. 15. Assessment and service plan requirements. Prior 7to admission to any establishment covered by this Act, a 8comprehensive assessment that includes an evaluation of the 9prospective resident's physical, cognitive, and psychosocial 10condition shall be completed. At least annually, a 11comprehensive assessment shall be completed, and upon 12identification of a significant change in the resident's 13condition, including, but not limited to, a diagnosis of 14Alzheimer's disease or a related dementia, the resident shall 15be reassessed. The Department may by rule specify 16circumstances under which more frequent assessments of skin 17integrity and nutritional status shall be required. The 18comprehensive assessment shall be completed by a physician. 19Based on the assessment, the resident's interests and 20preferences, dislikes, and any known triggers for behavior 21that endangers the resident or others, a written service plan 22shall be developed and mutually agreed upon by the provider, 23and the resident, and the resident's representative, if any. 24The service plan, which shall be reviewed annually, or more 25often as the resident's condition, preferences, or service   SB1299- 20 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1needs change, shall serve as a basis for the service delivery 2contract between the provider and the resident. The resident 3and the resident's representative, if any, shall, upon 4request, be given a copy of the most recent assessment; a 5supplemental assessment, if any, completed by the 6establishment; and a service plan. Based on the assessment, 7the service plan may provide for the disconnection or removal 8of any appliance. 9(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 10    (210 ILCS 9/75)11    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-844)12    Sec. 75. Residency requirements. 13    (a) No individual shall be accepted for residency or 14remain in residence if the establishment cannot provide or 15secure appropriate services, if the individual requires a 16level of service or type of service for which the 17establishment is not licensed or which the establishment does 18not provide, or if the establishment does not have the staff 19appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skill to provide 20such services.21    (b) Only adults may be accepted for residency.22    (c) A person shall not be accepted for residency if:23        (1) the person poses a serious threat to himself or 24    herself or to others;25        (2) the person is not able to communicate his or her   SB1299- 21 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    needs and no resident representative residing in the 2    establishment, and with a prior relationship to the 3    person, has been appointed to direct the provision of 4    services;5        (3) the person requires total assistance with 2 or 6    more activities of daily living;7        (4) the person requires the assistance of more than 8    one paid caregiver at any given time with an activity of 9    daily living;10        (5) the person requires more than minimal assistance 11    in moving to a safe area in an emergency;12        (6) the person has a severe mental illness, which for 13    the purposes of this Section means a condition that is 14    characterized by the presence of a major mental disorder 15    as classified in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of 16    Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) (American 17    Psychiatric Association, 1994), where the individual is a 18    person with a substantial disability due to mental illness 19    in the areas of self-maintenance, social functioning, 20    activities of community living and work skills, and the 21    disability specified is expected to be present for a 22    period of not less than one year, but does not mean 23    Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia based on 24    organic or physical disorders;25        (7) the person requires intravenous therapy or 26    intravenous feedings unless self-administered or   SB1299- 22 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    administered by a qualified, licensed health care 2    professional;3        (8) the person requires gastrostomy feedings unless 4    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 5    care professional;6        (9) the person requires insertion, sterile irrigation, 7    and replacement of catheter, except for routine 8    maintenance of urinary catheters, unless the catheter care 9    is self-administered or administered by a licensed health 10    care professional;11        (10) the person requires sterile wound care unless 12    care is self-administered or administered by a licensed 13    health care professional;14        (11) (blank);15        (12) the person is a diabetic requiring routine 16    insulin injections unless the injections are 17    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 18    care professional;19        (13) the person requires treatment of stage 3 or stage 20    4 decubitus ulcers or exfoliative dermatitis;21        (14) the person requires 5 or more skilled nursing 22    visits per week for conditions other than those listed in 23    items (13) and (15) of this subsection for a period of 3 24    consecutive weeks or more except when the course of 25    treatment is expected to extend beyond a 3-week 3 week 26    period for rehabilitative purposes and is certified as   SB1299- 23 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    temporary by a physician; or2        (15) other reasons prescribed by the Department by 3    rule.4    (d) A resident with a condition listed in items (1) 5through (15) of subsection (c) shall have his or her residency 6terminated.7    (e) Residency shall be terminated when services available 8to the resident in the establishment are no longer adequate to 9meet the needs of the resident. The establishment shall notify 10the resident and the resident's representative, if any, when 11there is a significant change in the resident's condition that 12affects the establishment's ability to meet the resident's 13needs. The requirements of subsection (c) of Section 80 shall 14then apply. This provision shall not be interpreted as 15limiting the authority of the Department to require the 16residency termination of individuals.17    (f) Subsection (d) of this Section shall not apply to 18terminally ill residents who receive or would qualify for 19hospice care and such care is coordinated by a hospice program 20licensed under the Hospice Program Licensing Act or other 21licensed health care professional employed by a licensed home 22health agency and the establishment and all parties agree to 23the continued residency.24    (g) Items (3), (4), (5), and (9) of subsection (c) shall 25not apply to a quadriplegic, paraplegic, or individual with 26neuro-muscular diseases, such as muscular dystrophy and   SB1299- 24 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1multiple sclerosis, or other chronic diseases and conditions 2as defined by rule if the individual is able to communicate his 3or her needs and does not require assistance with complex 4medical problems, and the establishment is able to accommodate 5the individual's needs. The Department shall prescribe rules 6pursuant to this Section that address special safety and 7service needs of these individuals.8    (h) For the purposes of items (7) through (10) of 9subsection (c), a licensed health care professional may not be 10employed by the owner or operator of the establishment, its 11parent entity, or any other entity with ownership common to 12either the owner or operator of the establishment or parent 13entity, including but not limited to an affiliate of the owner 14or operator of the establishment. Nothing in this Section is 15meant to limit a resident's right to choose his or her health 16care provider.17    (i) Subsection (h) is not applicable to residents admitted 18to an assisted living establishment under a life care contract 19as defined in the Life Care Facilities Act if the life care 20facility has both an assisted living establishment and a 21skilled nursing facility. A licensed health care professional 22providing health-related or supportive services at a life care 23assisted living or shared housing establishment must be 24employed by an entity licensed by the Department under the 25Nursing Home Care Act or the Home Health, Home Services, and 26Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act.   SB1299- 25 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1(Source: P.A. 103-444, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-844)3    Sec. 75. Residency requirements. 4    (a) No individual shall be accepted for residency or 5remain in residence if the establishment cannot provide or 6secure appropriate services, if the individual requires a 7level of service or type of service for which the 8establishment is not licensed or which the establishment does 9not provide, or if the establishment does not have the staff 10appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skill to provide 11such services.12    (b) Only adults may be accepted for residency.13    (c) A person shall not be accepted for residency if:14        (1) the person poses a serious threat to himself or 15    herself or to others;16        (2) the person is not able to communicate his or her 17    needs and no resident representative residing in the 18    establishment, and with a prior relationship to the 19    person, has been appointed to direct the provision of 20    services;21        (3) the person requires total assistance with 2 or 22    more activities of daily living;23        (4) the person requires the assistance of more than 24    one paid caregiver at any given time with an activity of 25    daily living;  SB1299- 26 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1        (5) the person requires more than minimal assistance 2    in moving to a safe area in an emergency;3        (6) the person has a severe mental illness, which for 4    the purposes of this Section means a condition that is 5    characterized by the presence of a major mental disorder 6    as classified in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of 7    Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) (American 8    Psychiatric Association, 1994), where the individual is a 9    person with a substantial disability due to mental illness 10    in the areas of self-maintenance, social functioning, 11    activities of community living and work skills, and the 12    disability specified is expected to be present for a 13    period of not less than one year, but does not mean 14    Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia based on 15    organic or physical disorders;16        (7) the person requires intravenous therapy or 17    intravenous feedings unless self-administered or 18    administered by a qualified, licensed health care 19    professional;20        (8) the person requires gastrostomy feedings unless 21    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 22    care professional;23        (9) the person requires insertion, sterile irrigation, 24    and replacement of catheter, except for routine 25    maintenance of urinary catheters, unless the catheter care 26    is self-administered or administered by a licensed health   SB1299- 27 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    care professional or a nurse in compliance with education, 2    certification, and training in catheter care or infection 3    control by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 4    with oversight from an infection preventionist or 5    infection control committee;6        (10) the person requires sterile wound care unless 7    care is self-administered or administered by a licensed 8    health care professional;9        (11) (blank);10        (12) the person is a diabetic requiring routine 11    insulin injections unless the injections are 12    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 13    care professional;14        (13) the person requires treatment of stage 3 or stage 15    4 decubitus ulcers or exfoliative dermatitis;16        (14) the person requires 5 or more skilled nursing 17    visits per week for conditions other than those listed in 18    items (13) and (15) of this subsection for a period of 3 19    consecutive weeks or more except when the course of 20    treatment is expected to extend beyond a 3-week 3 week 21    period for rehabilitative purposes and is certified as 22    temporary by a physician; or23        (15) other reasons prescribed by the Department by 24    rule.25    (d) A resident with a condition listed in items (1) 26through (15) of subsection (c) shall have his or her residency   SB1299- 28 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1terminated.2    (e) Residency shall be terminated when services available 3to the resident in the establishment are no longer adequate to 4meet the needs of the resident. The establishment shall notify 5the resident and the resident's representative, if any, when 6there is a significant change in the resident's condition that 7affects the establishment's ability to meet the resident's 8needs. The requirements of subsection (c) of Section 80 shall 9then apply. This provision shall not be interpreted as 10limiting the authority of the Department to require the 11residency termination of individuals.12    (f) Subsection (d) of this Section shall not apply to 13terminally ill residents who receive or would qualify for 14hospice care and such care is coordinated by a hospice program 15licensed under the Hospice Program Licensing Act or other 16licensed health care professional employed by a licensed home 17health agency and the establishment and all parties agree to 18the continued residency.19    (g) Items (3), (4), (5), and (9) of subsection (c) shall 20not apply to a quadriplegic, paraplegic, or individual with 21neuro-muscular diseases, such as muscular dystrophy and 22multiple sclerosis, or other chronic diseases and conditions 23as defined by rule if the individual is able to communicate his 24or her needs and does not require assistance with complex 25medical problems, and the establishment is able to accommodate 26the individual's needs. The Department shall prescribe rules   SB1299- 29 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1pursuant to this Section that address special safety and 2service needs of these individuals.3    (h) For the purposes of items (7) through (10) of 4subsection (c), a licensed health care professional may not be 5employed by the owner or operator of the establishment, its 6parent entity, or any other entity with ownership common to 7either the owner or operator of the establishment or parent 8entity, including but not limited to an affiliate of the owner 9or operator of the establishment. Nothing in this Section is 10meant to limit a resident's right to choose his or her health 11care provider.12    (i) Subsection (h) is not applicable to residents admitted 13to an assisted living establishment under a life care contract 14as defined in the Life Care Facilities Act if the life care 15facility has both an assisted living establishment and a 16skilled nursing facility. A licensed health care professional 17providing health-related or supportive services at a life care 18assisted living or shared housing establishment must be 19employed by an entity licensed by the Department under the 20Nursing Home Care Act or the Home Health, Home Services, and 21Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act. 22(Source: P.A. 103-444, eff. 1-1-24; 103-844, eff. 7-1-25.) 23    (210 ILCS 9/80)24    Sec. 80. Involuntary termination of residency. 25    (a) Residency shall be involuntarily terminated only for   SB1299- 30 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1the following reasons: 2        (1) as provided in Section 75 of this Act; 3        (2) nonpayment of contracted charges after the 4    resident and the resident's representative have received a 5    minimum of 30 days' 30-days written notice of the 6    delinquency and the resident or the resident's 7    representative has had at least 15 days to cure the 8    delinquency; or 9        (3) failure to execute a service delivery contract or 10    to substantially comply with its terms and conditions, 11    failure to comply with the assessment requirements 12    contained in Section 15, or failure to substantially 13    comply with the terms and conditions of the lease 14    agreement.15    (b) A 30-day 30 day written notice of residency 16termination shall be provided to the resident, the resident's 17representative, or both, the Department, and the long term 18care ombudsman, which shall include the reason for the pending 19action, the date of the proposed move, and a notice, the 20content and form to be set forth by rule, of the resident's 21right to appeal, the steps that the resident or the resident's 22representative must take to initiate an appeal, and a 23statement of the resident's right to continue to reside in the 24establishment until a decision is rendered. The notice shall 25include a toll free telephone number to initiate an appeal and 26a written hearing request form, together with a postage paid,   SB1299- 31 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1pre-addressed envelope to the Department. If the resident or 2the resident's representative, if any, cannot read English, 3the notice must be provided in a language the individual 4receiving the notice can read or the establishment must 5provide a translator who has been trained to assist the 6resident or the resident's representative in the appeal 7process. In emergency situations as defined in Section 10 of 8this Act, the 30-day provision of the written notice may be 9waived.10    (c) The establishment shall attempt to resolve with the 11resident or the resident's representative, if any, 12circumstances that if not remedied have the potential of 13resulting in an involuntary termination of residency and shall 14document those efforts in the resident's file. This action may 15occur prior to or during the 30-day 30 day notice period, but 16must occur prior to the termination of the residency. In 17emergency situations as defined in Section 10 of this Act, the 18requirements of this subsection may be waived.19    (d) A request for a hearing shall stay an involuntary 20termination of residency until a decision has been rendered by 21the Department, according to a process adopted by rule. During 22this time period, the establishment may not terminate or 23reduce any service without the consent of the resident or the 24resident's representative, if any, for the purpose of making 25it more difficult or impossible for the resident to remain in 26the establishment.  SB1299- 32 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    (e) The establishment shall offer the resident and the 2resident's representative, if any, residency termination and 3relocation assistance including information on available 4alternative placement. Residents shall be involved in planning 5the move and shall choose among the available alternative 6placements except when an emergency situation makes prior 7resident involvement impossible. Emergency placements are 8deemed temporary until the resident's input can be sought in 9the final placement decision. No resident shall be forced to 10remain in a temporary or permanent placement.11    (f) The Department may offer assistance to the 12establishment and the resident in the preparation of residency 13termination and relocation plans to assure safe and orderly 14transition and to protect the resident's health, safety, 15welfare, and rights. In nonemergencies, and where possible in 16emergencies, the transition plan shall be designed and 17implemented in advance of transfer or residency termination.18    (g) An establishment may not initiate a termination of 19residency due to an emergency situation if the establishment 20is able to safely care for the resident and (1) the resident 21has been hospitalized and the resident's physician, the 22establishment's manager, and the establishment's director of 23nursing state that returning to the establishment would not 24create an imminent danger of death or serious physical harm to 25the resident; or (2) the emergency can be negated by changes in 26activities, health care, personal care, or available rooming   SB1299- 33 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1accommodations, consistent with the license and services of 2the establishment. The Department may not find an 3establishment to be in violation of Section 75 of this Act for 4failing to initiate an emergency discharge in these 5circumstances.6    (h) If the Department determines that an involuntary 7termination of residency does not meet the requirements of 8this Act, the Department shall issue a written decision 9stating that the involuntary termination of residency is 10denied. If the action of the establishment giving rise to the 11request for hearings is the establishment's failure to readmit 12the resident following hospitalization, other medical leave of 13absence, or other absence, the Department shall order the 14immediate readmission of the resident to the establishment 15unless a condition which would have allowed transfer or 16discharge develops within that timeframe.17    (i) If an order to readmit is entered pursuant to 18subsection (h), the establishment shall immediately comply. As 19used in this subsection, "comply" means the establishment and 20the resident have agreed on a schedule for readmission or the 21resident is living in the establishment.22    (j) An establishment that does not readmit a resident 23after the Department has ordered readmission shall be assessed 24a fine. The establishment shall be required to submit an 25acceptable plan of correction to the Department within 30 days 26after the violation is affirmed.  SB1299- 34 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    (k) Once a notice of appeal is filed, the Department shall 2hold a hearing unless the notice of appeal is withdrawn. If the 3notice of appeal is withdrawn based upon a representation made 4by the establishment to the resident and the Department, 5including the hearing officer, that a resident who has been 6previously denied readmission will be readmitted, failure to 7comply with the representation shall be considered a failure 8to comply with a Department order pursuant to subsection (h) 9and shall result in the imposition of a fine as provided in 10subsection (j) of this Section.11(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 12    (210 ILCS 9/90)13    Sec. 90. Contents of service delivery contract. A contract 14between an establishment and a resident must be entitled 15"assisted living establishment contract" or "shared housing 16establishment contract" as applicable, shall be printed in no 17less than 12 point type, and shall include at least the 18following elements in the body or through supporting documents 19or attachments:20        (1) the name, street address, and mailing address of 21    the establishment;22        (2) the name and mailing address of the owner or 23    owners of the establishment and, if the owner or owners 24    are not natural persons, the type of business entity of 25    the owner or owners;  SB1299- 35 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1        (3) the name and mailing address of the managing agent 2    of the establishment, whether hired under a management 3    agreement or lease agreement, if the managing agent is 4    different from the owner or owners;5        (4) the name and address of at least one natural 6    person who is authorized to accept service on behalf of 7    the owners and managing agent;8        (5) a statement describing the license status of the 9    establishment and the license status of all providers of 10    health-related or supportive services to a resident under 11    arrangement with the establishment;12        (6) the duration of the contract;13        (7) the base rate to be paid by the resident and a 14    description of the services to be provided as part of this 15    rate;16        (8) a description of any additional services to be 17    provided for an additional fee by the establishment 18    directly or by a third party provider under arrangement 19    with the establishment;20        (9) the fee schedules outlining the cost of any 21    additional services;22        (10) a description of the process through which the 23    contract may be modified, amended, or terminated;24        (11) a description of the establishment's complaint 25    resolution process available to residents and notice of 26    the availability of the Department on Aging's Senior   SB1299- 36 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    Helpline for complaints;2        (12) the name of the resident's designated 3    representative, if any;4        (13) the resident's obligations in order to maintain 5    residency and receive services including compliance with 6    all assessments required under Section 15;7        (14) the billing and payment procedures and 8    requirements;9        (15) a statement affirming the resident's freedom to 10    receive services from service providers with whom the 11    establishment does not have a contractual arrangement, 12    which may also disclaim liability on the part of the 13    establishment for those services;14        (16) a statement that medical assistance under Article 15    V or Article VI of the Illinois Public Aid Code is not 16    available for payment for services provided in an 17    establishment, excluding contracts executed with residents 18    residing in licensed establishments participating in the 19    Department on Aging's Comprehensive Care in Residential 20    Settings Demonstration Project;21        (17) a statement detailing the admission, risk 22    management, and residency termination criteria and 23    procedures;24        (18) a written explanation, prepared by the Office of 25    State Long Term Care Ombudsman, statement listing the 26    rights specified in Sections 80 and Section 95, including   SB1299- 37 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    an acknowledgment by the establishment and acknowledging 2    that, by contracting with the assisted living or shared 3    housing establishment, the resident does not forfeit those 4    rights;5        (19) a statement detailing the Department's annual 6    on-site review process including what documents contained 7    in a resident's personal file shall be reviewed by the 8    on-site reviewer as defined by rule; and9        (20) a statement outlining whether the establishment 10    charges a community fee and, if so, the amount of the fee 11    and whether it is refundable; if the fee is refundable, 12    the contract must describe the conditions under which it 13    is refundable and how the amount of the refund is 14    determined. 15(Source: P.A. 93-775, eff. 1-1-05; 94-256, eff. 7-19-05.) 16    (210 ILCS 9/95)17    Sec. 95. Resident rights. No resident shall be deprived of 18any rights, benefits, or privileges guaranteed by law, the 19Constitution of the State of Illinois, or the Constitution of 20the United States solely on account of his or her status as a 21resident of an establishment, nor shall a resident forfeit any 22of the following rights: 23        (1) the right to retain and use personal property and 24    a place to store personal items that is locked and secure; 25        (2) the right to refuse services and to be advised of   SB1299- 38 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    the consequences of that refusal; 2        (3) the right to respect for bodily privacy and 3    dignity at all times, especially during care and 4    treatment; 5        (4) the right to the free exercise of religion; 6        (5) the right to privacy with regard to mail, phone 7    calls, and visitors; 8        (6) the right to uncensored access to the State 9    Ombudsman or his or her designee; 10        (7) the right to be free of retaliation for 11    criticizing the establishment or making complaints to 12    appropriate agencies; 13        (8) the right to be free of chemical and physical 14    restraints; 15        (9) the right to be free of abuse or neglect or to 16    refuse to perform labor; 17        (10) the right to confidentiality of the resident's 18    medical records; 19        (11) the right of access and the right to copy the 20    resident's personal files maintained by the establishment; 21        (12) the right to 24 hours access to the 22    establishment; 23        (13) the right to a minimum of 90 days' 90-days notice 24    of a planned establishment closure; 25        (14) the right to a minimum of 30 days' 30-days notice 26    of an involuntary residency termination, except where the   SB1299- 39 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    resident poses a threat to himself or others, or in other 2    emergency situations, and the right to appeal such 3    termination; if an establishment withdraws a notice of 4    involuntary termination of residency, then the resident 5    has the right to maintain residency at the establishment; 6    and 7        (15) the right to a 30-day notice of delinquency and 8    at least 15 days right to cure delinquency; and .9        (16) the right to not be unlawfully transferred or 10    discharged.11(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 12    Section 10. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 13changing Sections 1-114.005, 2-111, 3-401, 3-402, 3-404, 143-405, 3-411, and 3-413 and by adding Sections 3-305.6, 153-305.7, and 3-413.1 as follows: 16    (210 ILCS 45/1-114.005)17    Sec. 1-114.005. High risk designation. "High risk 18designation" means a violation of a provision of the Illinois 19Administrative Code or statute that has been identified by the 20Department through rulemaking or designated in statute to be 21inherently necessary to protect the health, safety, and 22welfare of a resident. 23(Source: P.A. 96-1372, eff. 7-29-10.)   SB1299- 40 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    (210 ILCS 45/2-111)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4152-111)2    Sec. 2-111. A resident shall not be transferred or 3discharged in violation of this Act. A resident may be 4discharged from a facility after he gives the administrator, a 5physician, or a nurse of the facility written notice of his 6desire to be discharged. If a guardian has been appointed for a 7resident or if the resident is a minor, the resident shall be 8discharged upon written consent of his guardian or if the 9resident is a minor, his parent unless there is a court order 10to the contrary. In such cases, upon the resident's discharge, 11the facility is relieved from any responsibility for the 12resident's care, safety or well-being. A resident has the 13right to not be unlawfully transferred or discharged.14(Source: P.A. 81-223.) 15    (210 ILCS 45/3-305.6 new)16    Sec. 3-305.6. Failure to readmit a resident. A facility 17that fails to comply with an order of the Department to readmit 18a resident, pursuant to Section 3-703, who wishes to return to 19the facility and is appropriate for that level of care and 20services provided, shall be assessed a $2,500 fine.21    As used in this Section, "comply with an order" means that 22a resident is living in a facility or that a facility and a 23resident have agreed on a schedule for readmission. 24    (210 ILCS 45/3-305.7 new)  SB1299- 41 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    Sec. 3-305.7. Ordered readmission of a resident.2    (a) A facility that complies with an order of the 3Department to readmit a resident that has been deemed to have 4been unlawfully discharged shall notify the Department within 510 business days after the resident has been readmitted to the 6facility. The notice provided to the Department shall include, 7but not be limited to, the following information:8        (1) the executed order to readmit the resident that 9    was issued by the Department;10        (2) the Administrative Law Judge's Report and 11    Recommendations submitted by the administrative law judge;12        (3) the reason or reasons for which the resident was 13    involuntarily discharged and an explanation of why the 14    facility determined it should discharge the resident prior 15    to the order to readmit;16        (4) the interventions the facility had taken to 17    attempt to mitigate or correct the behavior or condition 18    of the resident who was involuntarily discharged and 19    ordered to be readmitted;20        (5) any concerns that the facility maintains about 21    risks to safety associated with readmission of the 22    resident; and23        (6) a copy of the resident's current face sheet that 24    indicates the readmission date. Unique identifiers, such 25    as the resident's social security number and Medicare, 26    Medicaid, or insurance number shall be redacted.  SB1299- 42 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    (b) Upon readmission of a resident following an executed 2order by the Department, the facility shall conduct a 3reassessment of the resident to determine any necessary 4changes to the resident's care plan. The assessment shall 5include identification of any steps the facility could take to 6attempt to mitigate or correct the behavior or condition of 7the resident that resulted in the resident being involuntarily 8discharged.9    (c) When presented as part of a resident's record, the 10Department shall consider an order from an administrative law 11judge and steps the facility took to safely care for the 12resident when considering whether a violation occurred.  13    (210 ILCS 45/3-401)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-401)14    Sec. 3-401. A facility may involuntarily transfer or 15discharge a resident only for one or more of the following 16reasons: 17        (a) the facility is unable to meet the medical needs 18    of the resident, as documented in the resident's clinical 19    record by the resident's physician for medical reasons; 20        (b) for the resident's physical safety; 21        (c) for the physical safety of other residents, the 22    facility staff or facility visitors; or 23        (d) for either late payment or nonpayment for the 24    resident's stay, except as prohibited by Titles XVIII and 25    XIX of the federal Social Security Act. For purposes of   SB1299- 43 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1    this Section, "late payment" means non-receipt of payment 2    after submission of a bill. If payment is not received 3    within 45 days after submission of a bill, a facility may 4    send a notice to the resident and responsible party 5    requesting payment within 30 days. If payment is not 6    received within such 30 days, the facility may thereupon 7    institute transfer or discharge proceedings by sending a 8    notice of transfer or discharge to the resident and 9    responsible party by registered or certified mail. The 10    notice shall state, in addition to the requirements of 11    Section 3-403 of this Act, that the responsible party has 12    the right to pay the amount of the bill in full up to the 13    date the transfer or discharge is to be made and then the 14    resident shall have the right to remain in the facility. 15    Such payment shall terminate the transfer or discharge 16    proceedings. This subsection does not apply to those 17    residents whose care is provided for under the Illinois 18    Public Aid Code. The Department shall adopt rules setting 19    forth the criteria and procedures to be applied in cases 20    of involuntary transfer or discharge permitted under this 21    Section.22    In the absence of other bases for transfer or discharge in 23this Section, unless it has complied with the prior notice and 24other procedural requirements of this Act, a facility may not 25refuse to readmit a resident following a medical leave of 26absence if the resident's need for care does not exceed the   SB1299- 44 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1provisions of the facility's license or current services 2offered. 3(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 4    (210 ILCS 45/3-402)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-402)5    Sec. 3-402. Involuntary transfer or discharge of a 6resident from a facility shall be preceded by the discussion 7required under Section 3-408 and by a minimum written notice 8of 30 21 days, except in one of the following instances:9    (a) When an emergency transfer or discharge is ordered by 10the resident's attending physician because of the resident's 11health care needs. The State Long Term Care Ombudsman shall be 12notified at the time of the emergency transfer or discharge. 13    (b) When the transfer or discharge is mandated by the 14physical safety of other residents, the facility staff, or 15facility visitors, as documented in the clinical record. The 16Department, the Office of State Long Term Care Ombudsman, and 17the resident's managed care organization, if applicable, and 18the State Long Term Care Ombudsman shall be notified prior to 19any such involuntary transfer or discharge. The Department 20shall immediately offer transfer, or discharge and relocation 21assistance to residents transferred or discharged under this 22subparagraph (b), and the Department may place relocation 23teams as provided in Section 3-419 of this Act.24    (c) When an identified offender is within the provisional 25admission period defined in Section 1-120.3. If the Identified   SB1299- 45 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1Offender Report and Recommendation prepared under Section 22-201.6 shows that the identified offender poses a serious 3threat or danger to the physical safety of other residents, 4the facility staff, or facility visitors in the admitting 5facility and the facility determines that it is unable to 6provide a safe environment for the other residents, the 7facility staff, or facility visitors, the facility shall 8transfer or discharge the identified offender within 3 days 9after its receipt of the Identified Offender Report and 10Recommendation. 11(Source: P.A. 103-320, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (210 ILCS 45/3-404)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-404)13    Sec. 3-404. A request for a hearing made under Section 143-403 shall stay a transfer or discharge pending a hearing or 15appeal of the decision, unless a condition which would have 16allowed transfer or discharge in less than 30 21 days as 17described under paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 3-402 18develops in the interim.19(Source: P.A. 81-223.) 20    (210 ILCS 45/3-405)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-405)21    Sec. 3-405. A copy of the notice required by Section 3-402 22shall be placed in the resident's clinical record and a copy 23shall be transmitted to the Department, the State Long Term 24Care Ombudsman, the resident, and the resident's   SB1299- 46 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1representative, if any, and the resident's managed care 2organization.3(Source: P.A. 103-320, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    (210 ILCS 45/3-411)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-411)5    Sec. 3-411. The Department of Public Health, when the 6basis for involuntary transfer or discharge is other than 7action by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 8(formerly Department of Public Aid) with respect to the Title 9XIX Medicaid recipient, shall hold a hearing at the resident's 10facility not later than 10 days after a hearing request is 11filed, and render a decision within 14 days after the filing of 12the hearing request. The Department has continuing 13jurisdiction over the transfer or discharge irrespective of 14the timing of the hearing and decision. Once a request for a 15hearing is filed, the Department shall hold a hearing unless 16the request is withdrawn by the resident. If the request for a 17hearing is withdrawn based upon a representation made by the 18facility to the resident and the Department, including the 19hearing officer, that a resident who has been denied 20readmission will be readmitted, and the resident or resident 21representative notifies the Department that the facility is 22still denying readmission, failure to readmit is considered 23failure to comply with a Department order to readmit pursuant 24to Section 3-305.6, including the imposition of a $2,500 fine 25under Section 3-305.6.   SB1299- 47 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 2    (210 ILCS 45/3-413)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-413)3    Sec. 3-413. If the Department determines that a transfer 4or discharge is authorized under Section 3-401, the resident 5shall not be required to leave the facility before the 34th day 6following receipt of the notice required under Section 3-402, 7or the 10th day following receipt of the Department's 8decision, whichever is later, unless a condition which would 9have allowed transfer or discharge in less than 30 21 days as 10described under paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 3-402 11develops in the interim. The Department maintains jurisdiction 12over the transfer or discharge irrespective of the timing of 13the notice and discharge. 14(Source: P.A. 81-223.) 15    (210 ILCS 45/3-413.1 new)16    Sec. 3-413.1. Denial of transfer or discharge. If the 17Department determines that a transfer or discharge is not 18authorized under Section 3-401, then the Department shall 19issue a written decision stating that the transfer or 20discharge is denied. If the action of the facility giving rise 21to the request for hearings is the facility's failure to 22readmit the resident following hospitalization, other medical 23leave of absence, or other absence, then the Department shall 24order the immediate readmission of the resident to the   SB1299- 48 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1facility. The facility shall comply with the order 2immediately. A copy of the Department's written decision shall 3be placed in the resident's medical chart. A surveyor shall 4make an on-site inspection of the facility's compliance with 5the order unless the resident or resident representative 6notifies the Department in writing that there is compliance 7with the order. 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.  SB1299- 49 -LRB104 07843 BAB 17889 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    210 ILCS 9/104    210 ILCS 9/155    210 ILCS 9/756    210 ILCS 9/807    210 ILCS 9/908    210 ILCS 9/959    210 ILCS 45/1-114.00510    210 ILCS 45/2-111from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4152-11111    210 ILCS 45/3-305.6 new12    210 ILCS 45/3-305.7 new13    210 ILCS 45/3-401from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-40114    210 ILCS 45/3-402from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-40215    210 ILCS 45/3-404from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-40416    210 ILCS 45/3-405from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-40517    210 ILCS 45/3-411from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-41118    210 ILCS 45/3-413from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-41319    210 ILCS 45/3-413.1 new